GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-mountains.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     mountains
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	10-July-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# [E] http:!# publications.europa.eu/code/it/it-5000500.htm
!# [W] Wikipedia
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Prop +Adj +NAdj
+Demonym

+Mountain

+Place

+Sg +Pl
+Masc +Fem

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space


LEXICON ROOT 

!# mountains : World /Europe 


Everest+Prop+Mountain			MSG;			!#  Himalaya  			8850  		Asia 
K2+Prop+Mountain				MSG;			!#  Karakoram 			8616	 	Asia 
Kanchenjunga+Prop+Mountain			MSG;			!#  Himalaya 			8598 		Asia 
Cerro% Aconcagua+Prop+Mountain		MSG;			!#  Ande 			6959 		America del Sud 
Mount% McKinley+Prop+Mountain		MSG;			!#  Catena d'Alaska 		6194 		America del Nord 
Mount% Logan+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Saint Elias Mountains	6050 		America del Nord 
Kilimangiaro+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Rift Valley	 		5895 		Africa 
Pico% Cristóbal% Colón+Prop+Mountain	MSG;		 	!#  Sierra Nevada de Santa Marta 5800	 	America del Sud 
Pico% de% Orizaba+Prop+Mountain		MSG;		 	!#  Sierra Madre Oriental	5700 		America del Nord 
Damavand+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Monti Elburz 		5670 		Asia 
Elbrus+Prop+Mountain			MSG;		 	!#  Caucaso	 		5642 		Asia 
Vinson% Massif+Prop+Mountain		MSG;	 		!#  -		 		5140 		Antartide 
Ruwenzori+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Monti Mitumba 		5119 		Africa 
Puncak% Jaya+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Monti Maoke 		5030 		Oceania 
Pico% Bolivar+Prop+Mountain		MSG;	 		!#  Cordillera de Mérida 	5007 		America del Sud 
Monte% Bianco+Prop+Mountain		MSG;	 		!#  Alpi		 	4810 		Europa 
Ras% Dascian+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Acrocoro Etiopico 		4620 		Africa 
Gora% Belukha+Prop+Mountain		MSG;	 		!#  Altaj 			4506 		Asia 
Tajumulco+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Sierra Madre 		4220 		America Centrale 
Mauna% Kea+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Isola Hawaii 		4205 		Oceania 
Jebel% Toubkal+Prop+Mountain		MSG;	 		!#  Atlante 			4167 		Africa 
Gunong% Kinabalu+Prop+Mountain		MSG;			!#  Banjaran Crocker 		4101 		Asia 
Mont% Cameroun+Prop+Mountain		MSG;	 		!#  Adamoua 			4070 		Africa 
Gunnbjørns% Fjeld+Prop+Mountain		MSG;		 	!#  Groenlandia Orientale	3700 		America del Nord

Monte% Rosa+Prop+Mountain			MSG;		 	!#  Alpi Pennine 		4634 		Italia/Svizzera 
Cervino+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Alpi Pennine 		4478 		Italia/Svizzera 
Finsteraarhorn+Prop+Mountain		MSG;	 		!#  Alpi Bernesi 		4274 		Svizzera 
Grossglockner+Prop+Mountain		MSG;		 	!#  Alpi Noriche 		3798 		Austria 
Mulhacen+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Sierra Nevada 		3478 		Spagna 
Pico% de% Aneto+Prop+Mountain		MSG;	 		!#  Pirenei 			3404 		Spagna 
Marmolada+Prop+Mountain			FSG;	 		!#  Dolomiti 			3343 		Italia 
Etna+Prop+Mountain				MSG;		 	!#  Appennini 			3323 		Italia 
Zugspitze+Prop+Mountain			MSG;			!#  Alpi Bavaresi 		2962 		Germania 
Musala+Prop+Mountain			MSG;			!#  Rila			2925 		Bulgaria 
Olimpo+Prop+Mountain			MSG;		 	!#  Monti della Tessaglia	2917 		Grecia 
Triglav+Prop+Mountain			MSG;			!#  Alpi Giulie 		2864 		Slovenia 
Korab+Prop+Mountain			MSG;		 	!#  Monti Sar 			2753 		Albania/Macedonia 
Deravica+Prop+Mountain			MSG;		 	!#  Alpi Dinariche 		2656 		Serbia 
Gerlach+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Alti Tatra 			2655 		Slovacchia 
Pico% de% Europa+Prop+Mountain		MSG;			!#  Cordigliera Cantabrica	2648 		Spagna 
Moldoveanu+Prop+Mountain			MSG;		 	!#  Carpazi Meridionali 	2544 		Romania 
Bobotov% Kuk+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Alpi Dinariche 		2522 		Montenegro 
Galdhøpiggen+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Jotunheimen 		2469 		Norvegia 
Maglic+Prop+Mountain			MSG;			!#  Alpi Dinariche 		2386 		Bosnia Erzegovina 
Hvannadalshnukur+Prop+Mountain		MSG;			!#  Vatnajökull 		2119 		Islanda 
Kebnekaise+Prop+Mountain			MSG;		 	!#  Monti Scandinavi 		2111 		Svezia 
Goverla+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 		!#  Carpazi 			2061 		Ucraina 
Malhão% de% Estrela+Prop+Mountain		MSG;		 	!#  Serra da Estrela 		1993 		Portogallo 
Narodnaja+Prop+Mountain			MSG;			!#  Urali 			1894 		Russia

Alpi% Pennine+Prop+Mountain		FPL;
Alpi% Bavaresi+Prop+Mountain		FPL;
Alpi% Bernesi+Prop+Mountain		FPL;
Alpi% Noriche+Prop+Mountain		FPL;
Ande+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Carpazi+Prop+Mountain			MPL;
Caucaso+Prop+Mountain			MSG;	 
Cordigliera% delle% Ande+Prop+Mountain	FSG;
Cordigliera% Cantabrica+Prop+Mountain	FSG;
Dolomiti+Prop+Mountain			FPL;
Himalaya+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Pirenei+Prop+Mountain			MPL;
Sierra% Nevada+Prop+Mountain		FSG;
Sierra% Nevada+Prop+Mountain		FSG;
Urali+Prop+Mountain 			MPL;


Allegheny+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Alpi% Apuane+Prop+Mountain			FPL;
Alpi% Carniche+Prop+Mountain			FPL;
Alpi% Cozie+Prop+Mountain			FPL;
Alpi% Giulie+Prop+Mountain			FPL;
Alpi% Graie+Prop+Mountain			FPL;
Alpi% Lepontine+Prop+Mountain			FPL;
Alpi% Pennine+Prop+Mountain			FPL;
Alpi+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Alpi% Retiche+Prop+Mountain			FPL;
Ande+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Appalachi+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Appennini+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Appennino+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Apuane+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Aspromonte+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Carniche+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Cozie+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Giulie+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Graie+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Lepontine+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Madonie+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Montagne% Rocciose+Prop+Mountain		FPL;
Murge+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Pennine+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Retiche+Prop+Mountain				FPL;
Maiella+Prop+Mountain				FSG;
Balcani+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Colli% Albani+Prop+Mountain			MPL;
Colli% Euganei+Prop+Mountain			MPL;
Erei+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Ghati+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Iblei+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Monti% Sibillini+Prop+Mountain			MPL;
Nebrodi+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Peloritani+Prop+Mountain			MPL;
Pirenei+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Sudeti+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Tatra+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Vosgi+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Atlante+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Ben% Nevis+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Brenta+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Cervino+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Elicona+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Falterona+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Giura+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Gran% Sasso+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Himalaya+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Hissarlik+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Ida+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Indukush+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Karakorum+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Massiccio% Centrale+Prop+Mountain		MSG;
McKinley+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Moncenisio+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Mongibello+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Monginevro+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Parnaso+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Pollino+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Ruvenzori+Prop+Mountain				MSG;
Vesuvio+Prop+Mountain				MSG;


!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;
